Utah statutes.
70A-9a-110.   Security interests arising under Chapter 2 or 2a.
A security interest arising under Section 70A-2-401 or 70A-2-505, or
Subsection 70A-2-711(3) or 70A-2a-508(5) is subject to this chapter.  However,
until the debtor obtains possession of the goods:
(1)  the security interest is enforceable, even if Subsection 70A-9a-203(2)(c)
has not been satisfied;
(2)  filing is not required to perfect the security interest;
(3)  the rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed
by Chapter 2 or 2a; and
(4)  the security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest
created by the debtor.
